California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) In order to be eligible to receive funds under this section, a direct services contract applicant shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide a program and services to meet the special care needs of, and address the behavioral problems of, participants.

(2) Provide adequate and appropriate staffing to meet the nursing, psychosocial, and recreational needs of participants.

(3) Provide physical facilities that include the safeguards necessary to protect the participants’ safety.

(4) Provide a program for assisting individuals who cannot afford the entire cost of the program. This may include, but need not be limited to, utilizing additional funding sources to provide supplemental aid and allowing family members to participate as volunteers at the applicant’s facility.

(5) Utilize volunteers and volunteer aides and provide adequate training for those volunteers.

(6) Provide a match of not less than 25 percent of the direct services contract amount consisting of cash or in-kind contributions, identify other potential sources of funding for the applicant’s facility, and outline plans to seek additional funding to remain solvent.

(7) Maintain family and caregiver support groups.

(8) Encourage family members and caregivers to provide transportation to and from the applicant’s facility for participants.

(9) Concentrate on participants in the moderate to severe ranges of disability.

(10) Provide or arrange for a noon meal to participants.

(11) Serve as model centers available to other service providers for onsite training in the care of these patients.

(12) Maintain a systematic means of capturing and reporting all required community-based services program data.

(e) To the extent possible within their resources, direct services contract applicants are encouraged to:

(1) Establish contact with local educational programs, such as nursing and gerontology programs, to provide onsite training to students.

(2) Provide services to assist family members, including counseling and referrals to other resources.

(3) Involve the center in community outreach activities and provide educational and informational materials to the community.

(f) A direct services contractor shall be licensed as an adult day program, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, or as an adult day health care center, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1570.7 of the Health and Safety Code, and shall be subject to the requirements of this division, including this chapter, for purposes of operating an Alzheimer’s day care resource center. If the direct services contractor surrenders its adult day program or adult day health care center license, or if the license has been terminated as a result of noncompliance with applicable licensure or certification standards, these actions shall also serve to terminate the direct services contractor’s Alzheimer’s day care resource center contract.

(g) An Alzheimer’s day care resource center that was not licensed as an adult day program or adult day health care center prior to January 1, 2005, shall be required to be so licensed by January 1, 2008. A direct services program that qualifies to operate as an Alzheimer’s day care resource center after January 1, 2005, shall be required to be licensed as an adult day program or adult day health care center.

(h) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent existing adult day care services, including adult day health care centers, from developing a specialized program under this chapter. The applicants shall meet all of the requirements for direct services contractors in this chapter and satisfactorily demonstrate that the direct services contract funding award shall be used to develop a distinct specialized program for this target population.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

9543.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of the Brown Bag Program is to provide opportunities for sponsors and volunteers to glean through excess food stuffs that are donated, and distribute bags of food to help meet the nutritional needs of low-income older individuals.

(b) For purposes of this section “low-income older individual” means a person 60 years of age or older, with an income no higher than that of the annual basic benefit level provided under the State Supplementary Program for a person who is blind, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 12200.

(c) If services are being provided in compliance with subdivision (b) and it is then determined that a surplus of foodstuffs exists,
 the program may also provide these services to persons 60 years of age or older with an income that does not exceed 125 percent of the maximum income level for a low-income older individual, as specified in subdivision (b). The provision of services under this subdivision shall be contingent upon the availability of surplus food products, as determined by the local delivery site, and services shall be rendered within the limits of available funds. Services shall be provided to otherwise eligible low-income older individuals with incomes over the annual basic benefit level specified in subdivision (b) only after the local agency operating the program determines that the needs of low-income older individuals who meet all the requirements of subdivision (b) have been met.

(d) In order to be eligible to receive funds under this chapter, a direct services contract applicant shall meet, but need not be limited to, all of the following conditions:

(1) Provide a cash match of 25 percent and an in-kind match of 25 percent prior to receiving funds under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 9530) and this chapter.

(2) Use matching sources that are derived from, but are not limited to, city, county, and federal funds, contributions, and private or business donations. Priority shall be given to those local programs with a larger local match. State money shall be used as a catalyst for charitable contributions, including in-kind and local community support.

(3) Operate under a board of directors, with at least one low-income older individual as a representative, and other interested persons from the community.

(4) Provide adequate space to store food with necessary access to refrigerator and freezer
 storage.

(5) Utilize volunteers to distribute produce and unsold foodstuffs to low-income older individuals.

(6) Maintain a systematic means of capturing and reporting all required community-based services program data.

(e) Food distributed to older adults shall comply with county health regulations. Except for any injury resulting from gross negligence or willful act, no county or county agency established pursuant to this chapter and no person who donates any agricultural product shall be liable for any injury, including, but not limited to, injury resulting from the ingesting of the product, as a result of any act, or the omission of any act, in connection with donating any product pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 27.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9544.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of the Foster Grandparent Program shall be to provide personally meaningful volunteer community service opportunities to low-income older individuals through mentoring children with physical, developmental, or behavioral needs, in accordance with the federal National and Community Service Trust Act of 1993 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12651 et seq.).

(b) For purposes of this section, “foster grandparent volunteer” means an individual who is 60 years of age or older, has an insufficient income, as determined in accordance with Part 1208 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and provides at least four hours a day, five days a week of foster grandparent services under this chapter.

(c) Direct service contractors shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Be a city, county, city and county, or department of the state, or any suitable private, nonprofit organization, that demonstrates the ability to provide the specified services in a variety of settings, including, but not limited to, hospital pediatric wards, facilities for the physically, emotionally, or mentally impaired, correctional facilities, schools, daycare centers, and residences.

(2) Recruit, select, train, and assign staff and volunteers.

(3) Provide volunteer participants with the same benefits, transportation, stipends, and income exemptions as provided to the foster grandparent volunteers funded through the Corporation for National Service.

(4) Provide or arrange for meals, transportation, and supervision for volunteers.

(5) Provide benefits and meaningful volunteer service opportunities to low-income individuals 60 years of age and older.

(6) Serve children under 21 years of age who have special needs or who could benefit from relationships with adults.

(7) Provide services to persons, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Infants that are premature and have failed to thrive, children who have been abused and neglected, or chronically ill children in hospitals.

(B) Children who have autism, children with cerebral palsy or with intellectual or
 developmental disabilities, and children who have been placed in institutions.

(C) Children with physical disabilities, children with intellectual or developmental disabilities, children with emotional challenges, or children who are socially and culturally isolated in school settings or childcare centers, children who have been neglected, and children who have been abused in residential settings.

(D) Children who are delinquent and have been placed in correctional institutions.

(E) Children under 19 years of age who have been charged with committing, or adjudged to have committed, an offense that is the equivalent to a misdemeanor.

(8) Maintaining a systematic means of capturing and reporting all required community-based services program data.

(d) In addition to the opportunity to help children who have physical, developmental, or behavioral needs and would benefit from relationships with adults, foster grandparent volunteers shall receive all of the following:

(1) Expenses for transportation to and from their homes and the place where they render their services or may have transportation in buses or in other transportation made available to them.

(2) One free meal during each day in which the foster grandparent renders services.

(3) Accident insurance, an annual physical examination, and a nontaxable hourly stipend.

(e) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that funds are appropriated for its purposes in the annual
 Budget Act or in another statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 28.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9545.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of the Linkages Program shall be to provide care and case management services to at-risk older individuals and adults with functional impairments with priority for enrollment given to low-income individuals, to help prevent or delay placement in nursing facilities. For purposes of this section, “care or case management” means all of the following:

(1) As appropriate, ongoing care or case management to at-risk older adults and adults with functional impairments to help prevent or delay placement in nursing facilities.

(2) Client assessment, in conjunction with the development of a service plan with the participant and other appropriate persons, to
 provide for needs identified by the assessment.

(3) Authorization and arrangement for the purchase of services, or referral, with followup, to volunteer, informal, or third-party payer services. Contractors shall maximize to the fullest extent possible the use of existing services resources before using program funds to purchase services for clients. Any benefits received as a result of these purchases either shall not be considered income for purposes of programs provided for under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) or shall not be considered an alternative resource pursuant to Section 12301.

(4) Service and participant monitoring to determine that the services obtained are appropriate to need, of acceptable quality, and provided in a timely manner.

(5) Followup with clients, including periodic contact and
 initiation of an interim assessment, if deemed necessary, prior to scheduled reassessment.

(6) Assistance to older individuals entering or returning home from nursing facilities and who need help to make the transition.

(7) Comprehensive and timely information, when necessary, to individuals and their families about the availability of community resources, to assist at-risk older adults and adults with functional impairments to maintain the maximum independence permitted by their functional ability.

(8) Short-term specialized assistance, including timely one-time-only assistance in securing community resources, counseling, and the arrangement of an action plan, when there is a temporary probable threat to the ability of the at-risk older adult or adult with functional impairments to remain in the most independent
 living arrangement permitted by their functional ability.

(b) Contractors of the Linkages Program shall have experience in community long-term care services and capability to serve the at-risk older adults and adults with functional impairments, and where applicable, ensure separateness of the programs and demonstrate protective measures to avoid conflict of interest.

(c) Contractors of the Linkages Program shall have a systematic means of capturing and reporting all required community-based services program data.

(d) (1) Each county shall deposit funds collected pursuant to Section 1465.5 of the Penal Code in its general fund, to be available for use only for the support of services provided under this chapter in that county, including county administrative costs not exceeding 10 percent of the
 funds collected, except as otherwise provided in this subdivision. A county may join with other counties to establish and fund a program of services under this chapter.

(2) Funds utilized pursuant to this section shall not supplant, be offset against, or in any way reduce funds otherwise appropriated for the support of services provided under this chapter.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, on or before September 1, 2009, the department shall issue a revised program manual, program memorandum, or similar instructions to contractors regarding the prioritization of low-income individuals.

(2) Contractors shall give priority for enrollment to low-income individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 29.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9546.

(a) The purpose of the Respite Program shall be to provide temporary or periodic services for older adults with severe functional or cognitive limitations to relieve persons who are providing care, or recruitment and screening of providers and matching respite providers to clients.

(b) Direct services contractors shall do either one or more of the following:

(1) In acting as a respite care information and referral agency, recruiting and screening respite providers and matching respite providers to clients. Respite care registries shall consist of the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of providers, including, but not limited to, individual caregivers, volunteers, adult daycare services, including
 adult day health care services and services provided by licensed residential care facilities for the elderly.

(2) Arranging for and purchasing respite services for program participants.

(3) Maintaining a systematic means of capturing and reporting all required community-based services program data.

(c) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that funds are appropriated for its purposes in the annual Budget Act or in another statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 30.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9547.

(a) The purpose of the Senior Companion Program shall be to provide personally meaningful volunteer community service opportunities to older adults who are low income for the benefit of adults who need assistance with activities of daily living. It is the purpose of this chapter to enable older individuals to provide care and support on a person-to-person basis to adults with special needs, such as older adults who are at risk for institutionalization, in accordance with the National and Community Service Trust Act of 1993 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12651 et seq.).

(b) For the purposes of this chapter “senior companion volunteer” means an older adult who is 60 years of age or older, who is low-income, as determined in accordance with Part 1208 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations, and provides at least four hours a day, five days a week, of senior companion services under this chapter.

(c) Requirements of direct service contractors:

(1) Be a city, county, city and county, or department of the state, or any suitable private, nonprofit organization, that demonstrates the ability to provide the specified services in a variety of settings, including, but not limited to, in residential, nonresidential, institutional and in-home settings.

(2) Demonstrate the ability to recruit, select, train, and assign staff and volunteers.

(3) Provide volunteer participants with the same benefits, transportation, stipends, and income exemptions as provided to the senior companion volunteers funded through the Corporation for National
 Service.

(4) Provide or arrange for meals, transportation, and supervision for volunteers.

(5) Provide benefits and meaningful volunteer service opportunities to low-income individuals 60 years of age or older.

(6) Serve adults who have severe functional impairments.

(7) Provide services to, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Older adults who have severe functional or cognitive limitations that result in an individual’s inability to leave the home.

(B) Individuals with mental or neurological impairments who are capable of participating in activities, but have been denied access to those activities.

(C) Older adults who have withdrawn from all social interaction.

(D) Adults with physical disabilities who wish to participate in home- and community-based services programs, but who remain on waiting lists until there is an opening.

(8) Maintain a systematic means of capturing and reporting all required community-based services program data.

(d) In addition to the opportunity to help other adults who have special needs, such as at-risk older adults, senior companion volunteers shall receive all of the following:

(1) Expenses for transportation to and from their homes and the place where they render their services or transportation in buses or in other transportation made available to
 them.

(2) One free meal during each day in which the senior companion renders services.

(3) Accident insurance, an annual physical examination, and a nontaxable hourly stipend.

(e) Senior companions funded under this chapter shall not be assigned to individuals already receiving in-home supportive services.

(f) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that funds are appropriated for its purposes in the annual Budget Act or in another statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 31.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Multipurpose Senior Services Program [9560. - 9568.]

9560.

(a) The purpose of this chapter shall be to establish a program to serve frail elderly individuals 65 years of age and older who are certifiable for placement in a nursing facility. This program shall be known as the Multipurpose Senior Services Program, and shall be structured and carried out in a manner consistent with Section 1396n(c) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) This chapter clarifies the intent of the Legislature that the Multipurpose Senior Services Program shall continue:

(1) To prevent premature disengagement of older individuals from their indigenous communities and subsequent commitment to institutions.

(2) To provide optimum accessibility of various important community social and health resources available to assist active older individuals to maintain independent living.

(3) To provide that the frail older individual who has the capacity to remain in an independent living situation has access to the appropriate social and health services without which independent living would not be possible.

(4) To provide the most efficient and effective use of public funds in the delivery of these social and health services.

(5) To coordinate, integrate, and link these social and health services, including county social services, by removing obstacles that impede or limit improvements in delivery of these services.

(6) To allow the state substantial flexibility in organizing or administering the delivery of social and health services to its older individuals.

(7) To provide access to social and health services by providing information and outreach activities in the community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 859, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

9561.

Program services provided pursuant to this chapter may be purchased by program funds or received from other community sources that consist of, but are not limited to, case management services, recreation services, educational services, senior center programs, information and referral services, transportation, income maintenance counseling, housing services, outreach services, volunteer programs, legal services, home repair services, escort services, telephone reassurance services, friendly visiting services, health assessment services, psychological assessment services, nutrition services, home health services, preventive health services, mental health services, homemaker chore services, meals services, adult day care services, including adult day health care, and nonmedical respite care services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9562.

(a) This chapter shall be administered by the department, under the authority of an approved interagency agreement with the State Department of Health Services, the single state medicaid agency.

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, each department within the Health and Welfare Agency including departments designated as single state agencies for the programs described in Section 9561, shall waive regulations and general policies and make resources available which are necessary for the administration of this chapter, upon request of the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9563.

The department shall formulate criteria for approval and designation of local Multipurpose Senior Services Program sites. The criteria shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Specifications for a social and health review team to evaluate older individuals and to ensure that continuity of social, economic, and health services is provided to maintain older individuals at the appropriate level of care.

(b) Development of social and health services necessary to maintain the older individual at the appropriate level of care.

(c) Specifications for the quality of the social and health services to be provided.

(d) Coordination and integration of the social and health services described in Section 9561.

(e) The number of local sites, which shall be consistent with the funds made available for purposes of this chapter.

(f) Coordination with local governmental and nonprofit agencies concerned with multipurpose senior services.

(g) Maximize utilization of local resources, including service provided by established community-based senior citizen organizations and information and referral networks.

(h) Specifications for the evaluation of the proposals submitted for the new local sites and for the evaluation of the local sites.

(i) Conditions for determining the need for procurement of existing sites. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the department is not required to procure existing sites by the competitive bidding process, unless it deems it in the best interests of the state to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 558, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9564.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude expansion of Multipurpose Senior Services Program services if cost effectiveness is demonstrated. The expansion shall be accomplished by establishing new sites, by increasing numbers of clients served in existing sites, or by expanding the number of sites to include additional geographic regions of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 171.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9565.

The department shall do all of the following:

(a) Enter into agreements and negotiated contracts with any nonprofit organization or governmental entity to operate the local sites, consistent with the criteria adopted pursuant to Section 9563. In letting these contracts, the department shall not anticipate future appropriations.

(b) Make grants to local sites from available funds.

(c) Monitor local sites.

(d) Cause the service sites to be evaluated in accordance with the established criteria.

(e) Seek and utilize any available federal, state, or private funds that may be available for carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, local sites established pursuant to this chapter may contract with the Director of Health Services as Medi-Cal programs pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9. Contracts with the local sites shall be deemed to be for the purposes specified in Section 14494, and may utilize funds appropriated from the Health Care Deposit Fund pursuant to Section 14157.

(g) Assist in coordinating local site programs with local governmental programs and services for older individuals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9566.

The department may, where necessary to ensure the effective operation of a multipurpose senior services program, advance to the program’s local government and private nonprofit administering agency, an amount not to exceed 25 percent of the estimated annual allocation to the program, under this chapter, as determined by the department pursuant to the estimated annual budget submitted by the program. Subsequent payments to the local government and private nonprofit administering agency for the Multipurpose Senior Services Program shall be prorated to reflect any advance payment made under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9567.

This chapter shall remain in effect so long as a waiver pursuant to Section 1396n(c) of Title 42 of the United States Code has been granted by the federal Department of Health and Human Services to the State Department of Health Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9568.

The department shall explore options for, and obtain necessary legislative and governmental agency approvals to expand, the Multipurpose Senior Services Program. The department shall attempt to obtain the necessary federal approval to expand access to case management services into every planning and service area in the state and to improve the delivery of case management services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9.5. Multipurpose Senior Centers And Senior Centers Emergency Operations Plans [9625. - 9625.]

9625.

(a) No later than June 30, 2007, each multipurpose senior center and each senior center, as defined in subdivisions (j) and (n) of Section 9591, shall develop and maintain a written emergency operations plan. This emergency operations plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Facility preparation procedures to identify the location of first aid supplies, secure all furniture, appliances, and other free-standing objects, and provide instructions for operating gas and water shutoff valves.

(2) An inventory of neighborhood resources that shall include, but not be limited to, the identification and
 location of all the following nearby resources:

(A) Generators.

(B) Telephones.

(C) Hospitals and public health clinics.

(D) Fire stations and police stations.

(3) Evacuation procedures, including procedures to accommodate those who will need assistance in evacuating the center. This evacuation plan shall be located in an area that is accessible to the public.

(4) Procedures to accommodate seniors, people with disabilities, and other community members in need of shelter at the senior center, in the event that other community
 facilities are inoperable.

(5) Personnel resources necessary for postdisaster response.

(6) Procedures for conducting periodic evacuation drills, fire drills, and earthquake drills.

(7) Procedures to ensure service continuation after a disaster.

(8) Consideration of cultural and linguistic barriers in emergency and evacuation plans, and ways to appropriately address those barriers.

(b) In the development of the emergency operations plans required by this chapter, multipurpose senior centers and senior centers shall coordinate with the Office of Emergency Services, the local area agency on aging, as
 defined in Section 9006, and other relevant agencies and stakeholders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 537.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Aging Information and Education [9630. - 9631.]

9630.

As part of its role in providing leadership in advocating on behalf of older adults, the department shall make efforts to increase public awareness about areas of importance to California’s older adults their families, and other caregivers. These efforts to increase public awareness and education may be accomplished through the use of public service announcements, radio and television commercials or infomercials, access on the internet, newspaper and other periodical editorials and letters to the editor, public and corporate symposiums, symposiums or educational efforts by public or private schools, colleges, and universities, and mass transit and outdoor signage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 33.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9631.

(a) The department shall establish an Aging Information and Education Fund, from funds made available pursuant to the annual Budget Act, to implement public awareness of various issues, including at least the following areas:

(1) Medication management—to call attention to the large percentage of older individuals admitted to hospitals solely due to the mismanagement of prescribed and over-the-counter drugs, the need for proper and timely use of medications, and the role of the attending physicians in prescribing medications and their interactive potential for harm.

(2) Elder abuse prevention—to work in conjunction with state and local law enforcement entities to bring focus to the need to protect older individuals from physical, emotional, and fiduciary abuse, so that they may continue to live with peace of mind about their safety.

(3) Toll-free line for linkage to local service networks—to develop and make the public aware of a single statewide toll-free telephone number for access to local information about services available to the community for older individuals and persons with functional impairments.

(b) The sources of funding that may be used for this purpose include any nonprofit foundation, funds privately donated by individuals, and one-time-only funds designated for state operations. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize any expenditures that are not otherwise allowable by the originating source of the funding.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097) by Stats. 1997, Ch. 216, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10.5. Older Adult Wellness Program [9650. - 9681.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [9650. - 9654.]

9650.

The definitions contained in this article shall govern the construction of this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 689, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9651.

“Wellness” means optimizing opportunities for physical, social, and mental well-being throughout the course, in order to extend healthy life expectancy, productivity, and quality of life in older age.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 689, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9652.

“Older adult” means any person 60 years of age or older.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 35.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9653.

“Person with a disability” means the same as the term is defined by regulations established pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended in 1992 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), and the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 689, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9654.

“Older adult wellness program” means the program established pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 9660).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 36.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Older Adult Wellness Program [9660. - 9663.]

9660.

There is in the California Department of Aging an older adult wellness program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 38.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9661.

(a) The older adult wellness program shall have all of the following functions:

(1) Focus on educating California’s older adults, as well as caregivers, families, and health care professions, about the importance of living a healthy lifestyle, including, but not limited to, nutrition, exercise, injury prevention, and mental well-being.

(2) Provide information on, and help California’s culturally and ethnically diverse older adults and adults with, functional impairments.

(3) Provide educational information on the resources and services available for older adults from both private and public entities in communities throughout the state and
 the area agencies on aging. The educational material shall accommodate the diverse linguistic needs of various populations in the state, including, but not limited to, English, Spanish, Russian, Chinese, and Braille.

(4) Promote education and training for professionals and caregivers who work directly with older adults in order to maximize wellness.

(5) Generate a cultural shift to a more positive vision and expectation with respect to how aging is viewed by all Californians.

(6) Transform perceptions of aging into a more hopeful, appreciative, and aspiring mode of being.

(7) Create a new culture that cherishes each of us, including the population of older adults, adults with disabilities, our aging, our ethnic and racial diversity, our becoming elders,
 and our maturity.

(8) Advance the recognition of the unique status, experience, capacity, and role of older adults to become our models for guidance and inspiration.

(9) Replace the image of older adults who are “self-interested” with an image of older adults who are actively engaged and involved in their communities.

(10) Promote and mobilize older adults and adults with disabilities into emerging roles for the public benefit.

(11) Challenge the prevailing culture, to the extent that it discounts the value of age.

(12) Rid our culture of the negative attitudes toward adults who are aging and adults with disabilities.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 9663, state funds shall not be appropriated for the purpose of implementing paragraphs (5) to (12), inclusive, of subdivision (a), and the department is not required to undertake implementation of those paragraphs, unless it receives federal or private funds for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 39.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9662.

The department shall deliver, or provide for the delivery of, older adult wellness program information through a variety of means, including, but not limited to, the internet, radio, television, and newspaper advertising, brochures, posters, and newsletters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 40.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9663.

This article shall be implemented only to the extent funds are made available for the purposes of this article in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 689, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Campaign to Change Cultural Attitudes Toward and Perceptions of Older Adults [9664. - 9665.]

9664.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Ageism is the systematic stereotyping of, and discrimination against, persons based on age.

(2) Ageism is manifested, at both the individual and institutional levels, in a range of ways, from the perpetuation of stereotypes and myths about aging and older adults, the dislike and outright disdain of elders, and the simple subtle avoidance of contact with elders, to discriminatory practices against elders in housing, employment, and services.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to encourage the development of partnerships addressed at combating ageism
 in the workplace.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 41.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9665.

(a) The Legislature requests that the California Department of Aging partner with the Industry Coalition on Age Equity in Media, which is a joint coalition of the California Commission on Aging, Women in Film, and the Employment Development Department, to work with the entertainment industry in an effort to change cultural attitudes and perceptions of aging and older adults, with the goals of making the workplace more receptive to older workers and eradicating ageism in society.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this act, to generate pervasive, profound, and positive changes in our culture, vision, and attitudes toward aging.
